Hawaii statutes.
[§88E-14] County deferred compensation
plans. The counties may establish deferred compensation plans for their
respective employees. A plan so established need not be subject to the other
provisions of this chapter, but shall be in compliance with applicable federal
laws and regulations. [L Sp 1981 1st, c 7, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next